Illinois, session 104th, SB865.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Habitat Endowment Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 25/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Habitat Endowment Act.9(Source: P.A. 87-1015.)